Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 Organized Militia

Cross references.

Educational loans to members of Georgia National Guard, §

20-3-374

.

Purchase of liability insurance and other benefits for members of organized militia serving on state active duty, § 45-9-2.

38-2-20.
Land force; Army National Guard.

The land force of the organized militia shall be the Army National Guard and shall comprise the army units which are a part of the Georgia National Guard, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed, or commissioned therein. All persons who are members of the Army National Guard shall be federally recognized as such.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-401; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 16; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 27.

38-2-21.
Air force; Air National Guard.

The air force of the organized militia shall be the Air National Guard and shall comprise the air units which are a part of the Georgia National Guard, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed, or commissioned therein. All persons who are members of the Air National Guard shall be federally recognized as such. The army aviation units of the National Guard shall not be considered air units within the meaning of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 28.

38-2-22.
Naval force; Naval Militia.

The naval force of the organized militia shall be the Georgia Naval Militia and shall comprise the units and personnel forming the Naval Militia of the state as may be organized, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed, or commissioned therein. All persons who shall become members of the Georgia Naval Militia shall be members of the United States naval reserve or the United States marine corps reserve.

Should units of the naval militia be tendered to the state by the United States, the Governor is authorized in his discretion to accept them.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 4; Code 1933, § 86-301; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 26; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 29.

38-2-23.
State Defense Force.

The State Defense Force, whenever such a state force shall be duly organized under the Constitutions and laws of the United States and of this state, shall be a force of the organized militia.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 30; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 3.

38-2-24.
Organizational and training guidelines.

The forces of the organized militia shall be organized, armed, disciplined, governed, administered, and trained as prescribed by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 20; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 31.

38-2-25.
Assemblies; annual training; special duty; active duty; declaration of emergency.

Members and units of the organized militia shall assemble for drill or other equivalent training, instruction, or duties during each year and shall participate in field training, encampments, maneuvers, schools, conferences, cruises, or other similar duties each year as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States and by this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder; provided, however, that no assembly of any unit of the organized militia shall be ordered in time of peace for any day during which a state or federal election shall be held, except in case of disaster, riot, invasion, or insurrection, or imminent danger thereof.

Members of the organized militia may be ordered by the Governor or under his authority to perform special duty, including but not limited to duty in a judicial proceeding or court of justice conducted pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter or as a member of or in any other capacity with any military board or as an investigating officer or as a medical examiner.

Members and units of the organized militia may be ordered by the Governor to state active duty when in his judgment there exists a possibility of imminent danger of disaster, riot, insurrection, or gross breach of the peace; provided, however, that, when so called to state active duty, members and units may not be deployed to quell riots, insurrection, or gross breach of the peace or to maintain order until an emergency has first been declared as provided in Code Section 38-2-6 or 45-12-30.

Members of the organized militia, with their consent, may be ordered by the Governor to state active duty for any lawful purpose or purposes and without pay and allowances or other compensation, except as specifically set forth in such orders, but with all other privileges, rights, benefits, and immunities provided by the military laws or other statutes of this state; provided, however, that, when so called to state active duty, members of the organized militia may not be deployed to quell riots, insurrections, or a gross breach of the peace or to maintain order until an emergency has first been declared as provided in Code Section 38-2-6 or 45-12-30.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, § 86-801; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 20; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 32; Ga. L. 1969, p. 228, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1393, § 1.

38-2-26.
Maintenance of armories and training facilities for militia units.

Unless the same shall be furnished by the United States, counties, or municipal corporations, the state shall provide armory accommodations, bases, camps, target ranges, and mooring and other facilities and shall maintain the same for units of the Army National Guard, the Air National Guard, and the Naval Militia allotted to the state under the laws of the United States, accepted by the Governor, and organized under the authority of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 33.

38-2-27.
Organization of militia units to conform to federal regulations; Governor’s organizational powers; restrictions on disbanding units.

The Governor shall conform the organization of the Georgia National Guard and the Georgia Naval Militia, including the composition of all units thereof, to the organization of National Guard and Naval Militia units prescribed by the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

For the purposes stated in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor is authorized:

To organize, reorganize, or disband any unit, headquarters, or staff therein;

To increase or decrease the number of commissioned officers, commissioned warrant officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers of any grade therein; and

To increase or decrease the strength of the Georgia National Guard and the Georgia Naval Militia.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, no organization of the Georgia National Guard, the members of which shall be entitled to and shall have received compensation under 32 U.S.C. Section 104(f), as amended, shall be disbanded without the consent of the President of the United States; nor, without such consent, shall the commissioned or enlisted strength of any organization in the Georgia National Guard be reduced below the minimum prescribed therefor by the President of the United States.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 4, 17; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 34.

38-2-28.
Inactive National Guard; composition.

The inactive National Guard shall consist of the persons commissioned, appointed, or enlisted therein, such officers and enlisted men as may be transferred thereto from the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard, and such persons as may be enlisted therein under the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 35.

38-2-29.
Credit for active federal service.

For all purposes under this chapter, members of the organized militia who enter the active military service of the United States in time of war or under a call, order, or draft by the President or who enter and serve on active duty in the military service of the United States in time of peace and who thereafter return to the military service of the state shall be entitled to credit for time so served as if such service had been rendered to the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 36.

38-2-30.
Resumption of membership in organized militia by National Guard personnel on release from active federal service.

Upon their release from the active service of the United States, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the organized militia who have been in the active military service of the United States under call or order into service shall resume their membership in the organized militia as provided in the laws of the United States, regulations issued pursuant thereto, and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 37.

38-2-31.
Purchase and issue of military property; emergency purchases; disposal of obsolete property.

Under the direction of the Governor, the adjutant general shall authorize the purchase of such military property as may be required for the use of the organized militia. In extreme emergencies, however, the commanding officer of any force of the organized militia on active service may purchase such necessities as are required for the immediate use and care of his command. A report of such purchases shall be made forthwith to the adjutant general.

No military property shall be issued to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the organized militia and such forces as may be organized pursuant to Code Section 38-2-70. Obsolete ordnance property of the state, however, may be issued by the adjutant general, with the approval of the Governor, to municipalities and to educational, patriotic, and charitable organizations under such conditions as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-902, 86-1101, 86-1102; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 22; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 38.

Cross references.

State purchasing generally, §

50-5-50

et seq.

38-2-32.
Responsibility for military property or funds; bond; pay deductions for lost or damaged equipment; action by Attorney General to recover damages.

Military property of the state and of the United States shall be issued, safeguarded, maintained, accounted for, inventoried, inspected, surveyed, and disposed of as provided in applicable laws of the United States, regulations issued thereunder, and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

Every officer of the organized militia responsible for military property or funds of the state or of the United States shall give bond with good and sufficient security to the state in such amount as shall be determined and approved by the adjutant general, conditioned upon the safekeeping, proper use and care, and prompt surrender of the property or funds for which the officer may be properly responsible. The premiums for such bonds are to be paid from the funds of the Military Division, Department of Defense.

When military property is lost, damaged, or destroyed through the negligence or fault of a member of the organized militia, the amount determined as the value of the property or the cost of repairing the same may be collected from any pay or allowance due or to become due him from the state.

An action may be maintained in the name of the state in any court having jurisdiction thereof by the Attorney General upon the request of the adjutant general to recover from a member or former member of the organized militia found responsible for military property lost, damaged, or destroyed through his negligence or fault, the amount determined as the value of the property or the cost of repairing the same.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 158, § 3; Code 1933, §§ 86-1101, 86-1102, 86-1103; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 39.